Indiana, session 2026, HB1031.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-23-6.5-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2008,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. The board shall consult with the Indiana law
enforcement academy under IC 36-2-14-22.3 concerning criminal
investigations in the creation of:
(1) the training course for coroners and deputy coroners under
IC 36-2-14-22.3(a); and
(2) the annual training course for coroners and deputy coroners
under IC 36-2-14-22.3(b). IC 36-2-14-22.3(c).
SECTION 2. IC 35-52-36-13.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.3. IC 36-2-14-23 defines a
crime concerning coroners and deputy coroners.
SECTION 3. IC 36-2-14-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 254, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Whenever the coroner is
notified that a person in the county:
(1) has died from violence;
(2) has died by casualty;
(3) has died when apparently in good health;
(4) has died in an apparently suspicious, unusual, or unnatural
manner; or
HEA 1031 — Concur

2
(5) has been found dead;
the coroner shall, before the scene of the death is disturbed, notify a
law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in that area. The agency
shall assist the coroner in determining the cause, manner, and
mechanism of death. The coroner shall hold the human remains until
the investigation of how the person died and the medical investigation
of the cause of death are concluded.
(b) The law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall, in
cooperation with the coroner, secure, control, and process the
scene of the death. The agency shall conduct the criminal
investigation into the death, including but not limited to evidence
collection, witness interviews, suspect identification, and case
preparation.
(c) The coroner has exclusive custody of the body and any
property on the body not secured as evidence. The coroner shall
coordinate the examination and removal of the body with the law
enforcement agency to ensure preservation of evidence and the
integrity of the scene.
(d) The coroner and the law enforcement agency shall cooperate
fully, share information, and conduct their respective duties as part
of a single coordinated death investigation.
(b) (e) If the coroner reasonably suspects the cause of the person's
death to be accidental or intentional overdose of a controlled substance
(as defined by IC 35-48-1.1-7), the coroner shall do the following:
(1) Obtain any relevant information about the decedent
maintained by the INSPECT program established by
IC 25-1-13-4.
(2) Extract one (1) or more of the following bodily fluids from the
decedent:
(A) Blood.
(B) Vitreous.
(C) Urine.
(3) Test a bodily fluid extracted under subdivision (2) to
determine whether the bodily fluid contained any amount,
including a trace amount, of a controlled substance at the time of
the decedent's death.
(4) If the coroner reasonably suspects the cause of the person's
death to be accidental or intentional overdose of an opioid (as
defined in IC 35-48-1.1-31) or if the person was administered an
overdose intervention drug (as defined in IC 16-18-2-263.9) prior
to death and was unresponsive to the overdose intervention drug,
the coroner shall test a bodily fluid extracted under subdivision
HEA 1031 — Concur

3
(2) to determine whether the bodily fluid contained any amount,
including a trace amount, of xylazine at the time of the decedent's
death.
(5) Report the results of the test conducted under this subsection
to the Indiana department of health after completing the medical
investigation of the cause of the decedent's death.
(6) Provide the Indiana department of health notice of the
decedent's death, including any information related to the
controlled substances involved, if any.
(c) (f) The coroner:
(1) shall file a certificate of death with the county health
department, or, if applicable, a multiple county health department,
of the county in which the individual died, within seventy-two
(72) hours after the completion of the death investigation;
(2) shall complete the certificate of death utilizing all verifiable
information establishing the time and date of death; and
(3) may file a pending investigation certificate of death before
completing the certificate of death, if necessary.
(d) (g) If this section applies, the body and the scene of death may
not be disturbed until:
(1) the coroner has photographed them in the manner that most
fully discloses how the person died; and
(2) law enforcement and the coroner have finished their initial
assessment of the scene of death.
However, a coroner or law enforcement officer may order a body to be
moved before photographs are taken if the position or location of the
body unduly interferes with activities carried on where the body is
found, but the body may not be moved from the immediate area and
must be moved without substantially destroying or altering the
evidence present.
(e) (h) When acting under this section, if the coroner considers it
necessary to have an autopsy performed, is required to perform an
autopsy under subsection (g), (j), or is requested by the prosecuting
attorney of the county to perform an autopsy, the coroner shall arrange
for the autopsy to be performed by a:
(1) physician who:
(A) is certified by the American Board of Pathology; or
(B) holds a subspecialty board certification in forensic
pathology from the American Osteopathic Board of Pathology
and the American Osteopathic Association; or
(2) pathology resident acting under the direct supervision of a
physician described in subdivision (1).
HEA 1031 — Concur

4
A physician employed under subdivision (1) to perform the autopsy
shall be paid a fee of at least fifty dollars ($50) from the county
treasury.
(f) (i) If:
(1) at the request of:
(A) the decedent's spouse;
(B) a child of the decedent, if the decedent does not have a
spouse;
(C) a parent of the decedent, if the decedent does not have a
spouse or children;
(D) a brother or sister of the decedent, if the decedent does not
have a spouse, children, or parents; or
(E) a grandparent of the decedent, if the decedent does not
have a spouse, children, parents, brothers, or sisters;
(2) in any death, two (2) or more witnesses who corroborate the
circumstances surrounding death are present; and
(3) two (2) physicians who are licensed to practice medicine in
the state and who have made separate examinations of the
decedent certify the same cause of death in an affidavit within
twenty-four (24) hours after death;
an autopsy need not be performed. The affidavits shall be filed with the
circuit court clerk.
(g) (j) A county coroner may not certify the cause of death in the
case of the sudden and unexpected death of a child who is less than
three (3) years old unless an autopsy is performed at county expense.
However, a coroner may certify the cause of death of a child described
in this subsection without the performance of an autopsy if subsection
(f) (i) applies to the death of the child.
(h) (k) After consultation with the law enforcement agency
investigating the death of a decedent, the coroner shall do the
following:
(1) Inform a crematory authority if a person is barred under
IC 23-14-31-26(c) from serving as the authorizing agent with
respect to the cremation of the decedent's body because the
coroner made the determination under IC 23-14-31-26(c)(2) in
connection with the death of the decedent.
(2) Inform a cemetery owner if a person is barred under
IC 23-14-55-2(c) from authorizing the disposition of the body or
cremated remains of the decedent because the coroner made the
determination under IC 23-14-55-2(c)(2) in connection with the
death of the decedent.
(3) Inform a seller of prepaid services or merchandise if a person's
HEA 1031 — Concur

5
contract is unenforceable under IC 30-2-13-23(b) because the
coroner made the determination under IC 30-2-13-23(b)(4) in
connection with the death of the decedent.
SECTION 4. IC 36-2-14-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2017,
SECTION 95, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) At an investigation under this chapter, the
coroner shall examine persons wanting to testify and may examine
persons the coroner has summoned by the coroner's subpoena.
Witnesses shall answer under oath all questions concerning the death
under investigation.
(b) If a physician is required to attend an investigation and make a
post mortem examination, the coroner shall certify this service to the
county executive, which shall order payment for the physician from the
county treasury.
SECTION 5. IC 36-2-14-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 8. A witness testifying before a county coroner is entitled
to the same fees as a witness testifying in the circuit court for the
county.
SECTION 6. IC 36-2-14-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 9. The testimony of each witness at a coroner's
investigation shall be reduced to writing and signed by the witness. The
coroner shall, by recognizance in a reasonable sum, bind any witness
whose testimony relates to the trial of a person concerned in the death
to give evidence in court and shall send the written evidence and
recognizance of the witness to the court. The coroner shall commit to
the county jail a witness who refuses to enter into the recognizance
required by this section.
SECTION 7. IC 36-2-14-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2017,
SECTION 97, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) After viewing the body, hearing the
considering all the evidence relating to the death, and making all
necessary inquiries, the coroner shall determine the cause, manner,
and mechanism of death and draw up and sign the coroner's verdict
on the death under consideration. The coroner shall also make a written
report giving an accurate description of the deceased person, the
deceased person's name if it can be determined, and the amount of
money and other property found with the body. The verdict and the
written report are subject to inspection and copying under IC 5-14-3-3.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c), (d), and (e), a photograph,
video recording, or audio recording of an autopsy in the custody of a
medical examiner is declared confidential for purposes of
IC 5-14-3-4(a)(1).
HEA 1031 — Concur

6
(c) A surviving spouse may:
(1) view and copy a photograph or video recording; and
(2) listen to and copy an audio recording;
of the deceased spouse's autopsy. If there is no surviving spouse, the
surviving parents shall have access to the records under this section. If
there is no surviving spouse or parent, an adult child shall have access
to the records.
(d) Upon making a written request, a unit (as defined in
IC 36-1-2-23), the state, an agency of the state, the federal government,
or an agency of the federal government, while in performance of their
official duty, may:
(1) view and copy a photograph or video recording; and
(2) listen to and copy an audio recording;
of an autopsy. Unless otherwise required in the performance of official
duties, the identity of the deceased must remain confidential.
(e) The coroner or the coroner's designee having custody of a
photograph, a video recording, or an audio recording of an autopsy may
use or allow the use of the photograph, video recording, or audio
recording of the autopsy for case consultation with a pathologist or
forensic scientist. The coroner or the coroner's designee having custody
of a photograph, a video recording, or an audio recording of an autopsy
may also use or allow the use of the photograph, video recording, or
audio recording for training or educational purposes (as defined in
IC 16-39-7.1-1.5) if all information that identifies the individual on
whom the autopsy was performed is masked or removed from the
photograph, video recording, or audio recording. For purposes of this
subsection, information that identifies an individual consists of:
(1) the name;
(2) the address;
(3) the Social Security number;
(4) a full view of the face; or
(5) identifying marks on the body that are unrelated to the medical
condition or medical status;
of the deceased individual. A coroner or coroner's designee who allows
the use of autopsy information under this subsection has a duty to
disclose to each person to whom the coroner or coroner's designee
releases it that the information is confidential and may not be used for
a purpose other than the purpose for which it was originally released.
Information disclosed under this subsection is confidential. A coroner
or coroner's designee who fails to disclose the confidentiality
restrictions of this information commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(f) Except as provided in subsection (e), the coroner or the coroner's
HEA 1031 — Concur

7
designee having custody of a photograph, a video, or an audio
recording of an autopsy may not permit a person to:
(1) view or copy the photograph or video recording; and
(2) listen to or copy the audio recording;
of an autopsy without a court order.
(g) A court, upon a showing of good cause, may issue an order
authorizing a person to:
(1) view or copy a photograph or video recording; and
(2) listen to or copy an audio recording;
of an autopsy, and may prescribe any restrictions or stipulations that the
court considers appropriate.
(h) In determining good cause under subsection (g), the court shall
consider:
(1) whether the disclosure is necessary for the public evaluation
of governmental performance;
(2) the seriousness of the intrusion into the family's right to
privacy;
(3) whether the disclosure of the photograph, video recording, or
audio recording is by the least intrusive means available; and
(4) the availability of similar information in other public records,
regardless of form.
(i) In all cases, the viewing, copying, listening to, or other handling
of a photograph, video recording, or audio recording of an autopsy
must be under the direct supervision of the coroner, or the coroner's
designee, who is the custodian of the record.
(j) A surviving spouse shall be given:
(1) reasonable notice of the petition filed with the court to view or
copy a photograph or video recording of an autopsy or a petition
to listen to or copy an audio recording;
(2) a copy of the petition filed with the court to view or copy a
photograph or video recording of an autopsy or a petition to listen
to or copy an audio recording; and
(3) reasonable notice of the opportunity to be present and heard
at any hearing on the matter.
(k) If there is no surviving spouse, the notice under subsection (j)
must be given to the deceased's parents, and if the deceased has no
living parent, the notice must be given to the adult children of the
deceased.
(l) A coroner or coroner's designee who:
(1) is the custodian of a photograph, a video recording, or an
audio recording of an autopsy; and
(2) knowingly or intentionally violates this section;
HEA 1031 — Concur

8
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(m) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates a court order
issued under this section commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(n) A person who:
(1) receives autopsy information under subsection (e); and
(2) knowingly or intentionally uses the information in a manner
other than the specified purpose for which it was released;
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 8. IC 36-2-14-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.193-2018,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) As used in this section, "cornea" includes
corneal tissue.
(b) As used in this section, "decedent" means a person described in
section 6(a)(1) through 6(a)(5) of this chapter.
(c) As used in this section, "eye bank" means a nonprofit
corporation:
(1) organized under Indiana law;
(2) exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501 of the
Internal Revenue Code; and
(3) whose purposes include obtaining, storing, and distributing
corneas that are to be used for corneal transplants or for other
medical or medical research purposes.
(d) If under section 6(e) section 6 of this chapter the coroner
requires an autopsy to be performed upon a decedent, the coroner may
authorize the removal of one (1) or both of the decedent's corneas for
donation to an eye bank for transplantation, if the following conditions
exist:
(1) The decedent's corneas are not necessary for successful
completion of the autopsy.
(2) The decedent's corneas are not necessary for use as evidence.
(3) Removal of the decedent's corneas will not alter the
postmortem facial appearance of the decedent.
(4) A representative of the eye bank, authorized by the trustees of
the eye bank to make requests for corneas, has done the
following:
(A) Within six (6) hours after the time of death, made a
reasonable attempt to:
(i) contact any of the persons listed in the order of priority
specified in IC 29-2-16.1-8; and
(ii) inform the person of the effect of the removal of the
decedent's corneas on the physical appearance of the
decedent.
HEA 1031 — Concur

9
(B) Submitted to the coroner:
(i) a written request for the donation by the coroner of
corneas of the decedent subject to autopsy under section 6(e)
section 6 of this chapter; and
(ii) a written certification that corneas donated under this
section are intended to be used only for cornea transplant.
(5) The removal of the corneas and their donation to the eye bank
will not alter a gift made by:
(A) the decedent when alive; or
(B) any of the persons listed in the order of priority specified
in IC 29-2-16.1-8;
to an agency or organization other than the eye bank making the
request for the donation.
(6) The coroner, at the time the removal and donation of a
decedent's corneas is authorized, does not know of any objection
to the removal and donation of the decedent's corneas made by:
(A) the decedent, as evidenced in a written document executed
by the decedent when alive; or
(B) any of the persons listed in the order of priority specified
in IC 29-2-16.1-8.
(e) A person, including a coroner and an eye bank and the eye
bank's representatives, who exercises reasonable care in complying
with subsection (d)(6) is immune from civil liability arising from
cornea removal and donation allowed under this section.
(f) A person who authorizes the donation of a decedent's corneas
may not be charged for the costs related to the donation. The recipient
of the donation is responsible for the costs related to the donation.
SECTION 9. IC 36-2-14-20, AS AMENDED BY P.L.225-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) This section applies only to the autopsy of
a person whose death is:
(1) natural;
(2) suspicious;
(3) violent;
(4) accidental; or
(5) from an overdose.
(b) As used in this section, "autopsy" means the external and
surgical internal examination of all body systems of a decedent,
including toxicology and histology.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (e) and IC 4-24-4-1, if an
Indiana resident dies in an Indiana county as a result of an incident that
occurred in another Indiana county, the county coroner where the death
HEA 1031 — Concur

10
occurred shall contact the coroner of the county where the incident
occurred to discuss whether an autopsy is needed. The coroner where
the incident occurred must respond to the coroner where the death
occurred not more than twenty-four (24) hours after being contacted to
discuss the need for an autopsy. If, after discussion, the coroners:
(1) agree that an autopsy is needed:
(A) the coroner of the county in which the incident occurred
is responsible for the cost of the autopsy, including the
physician fee under section 6(e) section 6 of this chapter; and
(B) the coroner of the county where the death occurred shall
bill the county in which the incident occurred for the costs in
clause (A) not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after
the death occurred; or
(2) disagree that an autopsy is needed, the coroner of the county
that conducts the autopsy is responsible for the cost of the
autopsy, including the physician fee under section 6(e) section 6
of this chapter except in the instance of a criminal case that could
result in criminal charges in which the county where the incident
occurred is responsible for the cost of the autopsy, including the
physician fee under section 6(e) section 6 of this chapter.
(d) If the coroner where the incident occurred fails to respond to the
coroner where the death occurred not more than twenty-four (24) hours
after being contacted under subsection (c) to discuss whether an
autopsy is needed:
(1) the coroner where the death occurred may perform an autopsy,
if the coroner believes that an autopsy is warranted;
(2) the coroner of the county in which the incident occurred is
responsible for the cost of the autopsy, including the physician fee
under section 6(e) section 6 of this chapter; and
(3) the coroner of the county where the death occurred shall bill
the county in which the incident occurred for the costs in
subdivision (2) not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after
the death occurred.
(e) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) and IC 4-24-4-1,
payment for the costs of an autopsy requested by a party other than the:
(1) prosecuting attorney; or
(2) county coroner;
of the county in which the individual died must be made by the party
requesting the autopsy.
(f) This section does not preclude the coroner of a county in which
a death occurs from attempting to recover autopsy costs from the
jurisdiction outside Indiana where the incident that caused the death
HEA 1031 — Concur

11
occurred.
SECTION 10. IC 36-2-14-22.1, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 22.1. (a) As used in this
section, "hospital" refers to a hospital that is licensed under IC 16-21-2.
(b) Upon the request of a coroner who is conducting or will conduct
a death investigation on an individual who is admitted or was admitted
to a hospital, the hospital shall provide a sample of the individual's
blood or tissue to the coroner.
(c) A hospital shall have a blood retention protocol for the
preservation of the first sample of blood drawn for an individual
seeking treatment of emergency care services at an emergency
department of the hospital regardless of whether the individual is
ultimately admitted to the hospital. who is:
(1) treated for an injury that is suspicious, violent, accidental,
or from an overdose;
(2) determined by a provider to be critically injured or
mortally wounded at the time the patient seeks emergency
care services at the emergency department; and
(3) admitted as an inpatient to the hospital.
The requirements set forth in this subsection may be waived in any
case where a first sample of blood cannot be drawn in the best
interest of the clinical care of the patient or the first sample of
blood is adulterated.
(d) The protocol under subsection (c) shall include a plan for:
(1) when a patient is transferred to another hospital; and
(2) notifying the laboratory for a requisition or order for whole
blood sample analysis for the patient identified under
subsection (c). to indicate when a patient is:
(A) treated for an injury that is suspicious, violent, accidental,
or from an overdose; and
(B) determined by a provider to be critically injured or
mortally wounded at the time the patient seeks emergency care
services at the emergency department.
(d) (e) A laboratory that receives an order for whole blood sample
analysis and the notification under subsection (c)(2) (d)(2) shall do the
following:
(1) The laboratory shall hold the blood sample in storage until the
earlier of the following:
(A) The expiration of the twenty-one (21) day period
beginning on the date that the sample of the patient's blood is
HEA 1031 — Concur

12
drawn.
(B) The date of the patient's discharge from the hospital. For
purposes of this clause, the transfer of the patient to another
hospital does not constitute a discharge.
(C) The date of the patient's death.
(2) This subdivision applies if:
(A) the patient is transferred to another hospital; and
(B) at the time of the transfer, the transferring hospital
laboratory is still holding the first blood sample in storage in
accordance with subdivision (1)(A).
The transferring hospital laboratory shall hold the first blood
sample in storage in accordance with subdivision (1)(A), unless
the transferring hospital laboratory receives information from the
receiving hospital that the patient has been discharged from the
receiving hospital or has died.
The requirements set forth in this subsection may be waived in any
case where the sample is tested and cannot be retained for reasons of
medical necessity in the clinical care of the patient.
(e) (f) A coroner does not need to obtain a warrant to request a
blood or tissue sample under this section.
SECTION 11. IC 36-2-14-22.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2008,
SECTION 258, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22.3. (a) The coroners training
board established by IC 4-23-6.5-3, in consultation with the Indiana
law enforcement academy, shall create and offer a training course for
coroners and deputy coroners. The training course must include, at
a minimum, forty (40) hours of instruction. The training course
must require each coroner and deputy coroner to attend, complete,
and successfully pass a certification program that consists of
in-person classroom lectures and instruction, as well as a
supervised externship.
(b) The training course described in subsection (a) must include
instruction regarding:
(1) at least forty (40) hours of instruction; and
(2) instruction regarding:
(A) (1) death investigation;
(B) (2) crime scenes; and
(C) (3) preservation of evidence at a crime scene for police and
crime lab technicians.
(b) (c) The coroners training board, in consultation with the Indiana
law enforcement academy, shall create and offer an annual training
course for coroners and deputy coroners. The annual training course
HEA 1031 — Concur

13
must include at a minimum eight (8) hours of instruction and cover
recent developments in:
(1) include at least eight (8) hours of instruction; and
(2) cover recent developments in:
(A) (1) death investigation;
(B) (2) crime scenes; and
(C) (3) preservation of evidence at a crime scene for police and
crime lab technicians.
(c) (d) In creating the courses under this section subsections (a) and
(b), the coroners training board shall consult with a pathologist
certified by the American Board of Pathology regarding medical issues
that are a part of the training courses.
(d) (e) All training in the courses offered under this section
subsections (a) and (b) that involves medical issues must be approved
by a pathologist certified by the American Board of Pathology.
(e) (f) All training in the courses offered under this section
subsections (a) and (b) that involves crime scenes and evidence
preservation must be approved by a law enforcement officer.
(f) (g) The coroners training board shall issue a coroner or deputy
coroner a certificate upon successful completion of the courses
described in subsections (a) and (b). this section.
SECTION 12. IC 36-2-14-23, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2008,
SECTION 260, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. (a) Each coroner shall
successfully complete the training course offered under section 22.3(a)
of this chapter within six (6) months after taking office.
(b) Each deputy coroner shall successfully complete the training
course offered under section 22.3(a) of this chapter within one (1) year
after beginning employment with a coroner's office.
(c) Each coroner and each deputy coroner shall successfully
complete the annual training course offered under section 22.3(b)
22.3(c) of this chapter each year after the year in which the coroner or
deputy coroner received the training required by section 22.3(a) of this
chapter.
(d) After a coroner or deputy coroner has:
(1) successfully completed the training course as required under
subsection (a) or (b); and
(2) successfully completed the annual training course as required
under subsection (c);
the coroner or deputy coroner shall present a certificate or other
evidence to the county executive, or in the case of a county that
contains a consolidated city, the city-county council, that the coroner
HEA 1031 — Concur

14
or deputy coroner has successfully completed the training required
under subsection (a), (b), or (c).
(e) If a coroner or deputy coroner does not present a certificate or
other evidence to the county executive, or in the case of a county that
contains a consolidated city, the city-county council, that the coroner
or deputy coroner has successfully completed the training required
under subsection (a), (b), or (c), the county executive or city-county
council shall order the auditor to withhold the paycheck of the coroner
or deputy coroner until the coroner or deputy coroner satisfies the
respective training requirements under subsections (a), (b), and (c),
unless the county executive or city-county council adopts a resolution
finding that:
(1) the failure of the coroner or deputy coroner to complete the
respective training requirements under subsections (a), (b), and
(c) is the result of unusual circumstances;
(2) the coroner or deputy coroner is making reasonable progress,
under the circumstances, toward completing the respective
training requirements under subsections (a), (b), and (c); and
(3) in light of the unusual circumstances described in subdivision
(1), withholding the paycheck of the coroner or deputy coroner
would be unjust.
(f) If the county executive or city-county council orders an auditor
to withhold a paycheck under subsection (e) and a coroner or deputy
coroner later presents a certificate or other evidence to the county
executive or city-county council that the coroner or deputy coroner has
successfully completed training required under subsection (a), (b), or
(c), the county executive or city-county council shall order the auditor
to release all of the coroner's or deputy coroner's paychecks that were
withheld from the coroner or deputy coroner.
(g) A coroner or deputy coroner who has not successfully
completed the training required under subsection (a) or (b) may
not conduct a death investigation or sign a death certificate. A
coroner or deputy coroner who knowingly or intentionally violates
this subsection commits conducting an improper investigation, a
Class B misdemeanor.
(h) If a coroner or deputy coroner begins a training course
required under subsection (a) or (b) but fails to complete the
course within the time required by this section, the county shall
reimburse the coroners training board for the cost of the training.
The county may recover from the individual the amount the county
reimbursed the coroners training board under this subsection.
SECTION 13. An emergency is declared for this act.
HEA 1031 — Concur

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1031 — Concur